Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 4.
SURETIES ON OFFICIAL BONDS (CONST., ART. 19, § 21 AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 21, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1899 regular session (see Acts 1899, p. 386). It was declared adopted by the Speaker of the House on January 17, 1901, and so proclaimed by the Governor. The vote for the amendment was 65,825 and the vote against the amendment was 23,033.